Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202639-1652
District; consolidation; petition; hearing; notice; resolution of county board.

(1) A petition to consolidate two or more districts in a county may be filed:

(a) By persons that own not less than twenty-five percent of the territory of each district in the proposed consolidation; and

(b) If special assessments have been or will be imposed in each district in the proposed consolidation.

(2) A petition described in subsection (1) of this section shall be filed with the county clerk.

(3) If a petition is filed pursuant to this section, the board shall set a time and place for a hearing pursuant to sections 39-1641 and 39-1642. At the hearing the board may pass a resolution consolidating the districts that are described in the petition.

Laws 1963, c. 213, § 15, p. 685;

Laws 2026, LB1126, § 64.
July 18, 2026